src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_UUSI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 27 back
!!€  uusi: uusi+A+Sg+Nom # new
0:si  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TÄYSI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 27 front
!!€  täysi: täysi+A+Sg+Nom # full
0:si  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjective examples of other gradation variants or consonant
!!  cluster simplifications in this class.

!!  !Consonant-final stems
!!  The consonant stems use inverted gradation if applicable, that is, the 
!!  nominatives have end in consonants and their gradating consonants are in
!!  weak form. Most of these are rarer for adjectives than nouns.



LEXICON ADJ_TYVEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 32
!!€  tyven: tyven+A+Sg+Nom # calm (of bodies of water)
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no back vowel variants or gradating words in the basic e
!!  conjoining pattern.


LEXICON ADJ_AVOIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 33
!!€  avoin: avoin+A+Sg+Nom # open
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:me  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:me  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:me  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no other examples of n:m final variation before conjoining e.

!!  !Caritives
!!  The common case of n:m variation with conjoining a before singular stems is
!!  from caritive suffix -tOn, that forms adjectives productively. 


LEXICON ADJ_ALASTON
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 back
!!€  alaston: alaston+A+Sg+Nom # naked
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VIATON
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 0~t back
!!€  viaton: viaton+A+Sg+Nom # innocent
0:on  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:on  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:on  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:oma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:om  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYVYTÖN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 0~t front
!!€  kyvytön: kyvytön+A+Sg+Nom # unskilled
0:ön  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ön  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:ön  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  This one word, hapan, also takes the same variation as normative variant.
!!  The expected e variant is not normative, but used.

LEXICON ADJ_HAPAN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 0~p back
!!€  hapan: hapan+A+Sg+Nom # sour
0:an  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pama  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pam  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:an  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:pama  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:pam  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:pam  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:an  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:pam  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄMMIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 m~p front
!!€  lämmin: lämmin+A+Sg+Nom # warm
0:min  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pimä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:min  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:pimä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:min  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:pimä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Lexicalised superlatives

LEXICON ADJ_PAHIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 35 back
!!€  uloin: uloin+A+Sg+Nom # outermost
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SISIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 35 front
!!€  sisin: sisin+A+Sg+Nom # innermost
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mmä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:mpä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:mpä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mmä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  Vasen inflects almost like superlative

LEXICON ADJ_VASEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 36
!!€  vasen: vasen+A+Sg+Nom # left
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
mpa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !nen suffixes
!!  Adjectives are commonly formed with nen derivatonns.

LEXICON ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 38 back
!!€  aakkosellinen: aakkosellinen+A+Sg+Nom # alphabetic

0:nen  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:se  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:se  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:se  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0:se  ADJ_BACK_DERIV_STI  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC  ;
0  ADJ_COMPOUND_S  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 38 front
!!€  kylmäjärkinen: kylmäjärkinen+A+Sg+Nom # levelminded
0:nen  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:se  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:se  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:se  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !s-final adjectives

!!  Most of the cases here are nouns from noun derivations.

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
alaston+A:alasto  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
alin+A:ali  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
anksiolyyttinen+A:anksiolyytti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
aseeton+A:aseet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
avoin+A:avoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
burmalainen+A:burmalai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
eetillinen+A:eetilli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ei-uusi+A:ei-uu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
enin+A:eni  ADJ_SISIN  ;
ennakkoluuloton+A:ennakkoluulot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
epätosi+A:epäto  ADJ_UUSI  ;
epätosi+A:epä#to  ADJ_UUSI  ;
eriasteinen+A:eriastei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
erääntymätön+A:erääntymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
granaatinvärinen+A:granaatinväri  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
hapan+A:hap  ADJ_HAPAN  ;
harvaoksainen+A:harva#oksai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
hengetön+A:henget  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
huolimaton+A:huolimat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
huono-onninen+A:huono-onni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
hyväntekeväinen+A:hyväntekeväi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
hämmentymätön+A:hämmentymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
ilkialaston+A:ilkialasto  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
irtain+A:irtai  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
jambinen+A:jambi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
jäljittelemätön+A:jäljittelemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
jäävitön+A:jäävit  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
kahdeksankymppinen+A:kahdeksankymppi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kansalaisuudeton+A:kansalais#uudet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
kestämätön+A:kestämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
kiihkoislamilainen+A:kiihko#islamilai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
kireäilmeinen+A:kireä#ilmei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
korjauskelvoton+A:korjauskelvot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
kylmäjärkinen+A:kylmä#järki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
käsineetön+A:käsineet  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
käyttölämmin+A:käyttöläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
käyttölämmin+A:käyttö#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
käärmetukkainen+A:käärme#tukkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
lahjaton+A:lahjato  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
lahjomaton+A:lahjomato  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
laitakukaton+A:laita#kukat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
likin+A:liki  ADJ_SISIN  ;
luolamiesmäinen+A:luola#miesmäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lypsylämmin+A:lypsyläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
lypsylämmin+A:lypsy#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
lähin+A:lähi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
lähtemätön+A:lähtemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
lämmin+A:läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
magneetiton+A:magneetit  ADJ_VIATON  ;
mielikuvituksellinen+A:mieli#kuvitukselli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
monilehtinen+A:monilehti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
määrätön+A:määrät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
nurjaton+A:nurjat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
ohjauskykyinen+A:ohjaus#kykyi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ordoviikkinen+A:ordoviikki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
parahin+A:parahi  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
parhain+A:parhai  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
peruuttamaton+A:peruuttamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
pidättämätön+A:pidättämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
pikkulämmin+A:pikkuläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
pikkulämmin+A:pikku#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
pisin+A:pisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
polanteinen+A:polan#tei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
psykoseksuaalinen+A:psykoseksuaali  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
puolialaston+A:puolialasto  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
puoliavoin+A:puoli#avoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
puoliavoin+A:puoliavoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
päättymätön+A:päättymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
resessiivinen+A:resessiivi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
rikkaruohoton+A:rikkaruohot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
samanaikainen+A:samanaikai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
selväjärkinen+A:selvä#järki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sijaton+A:sijat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
silittämätön+A:silittämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
sisin+A:sisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
syvänkeltainen+A:syvänkeltai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
sävelkorvaton+A:sävel#korvat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
taain+A:taai  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
tain+A:tai  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
talvilämmin+A:talviläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
talvilämmin+A:talvi#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
tasalämmin+A:tasaläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
tasalämmin+A:tasa#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
tekemätön+A:tekemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
toiskätinen+A:tois#käti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tolkuton+A:tolkut  ADJ_VIATON  ;
tosi+A:to  ADJ_UUSI  ;
tyven+A:tyven  ADJ_TYVEN  ;
täpötäysi+A:täpötäy  ADJ_TÄYSI  ;
täysi+A:täy  ADJ_TÄYSI  ;
täytäntöönpanokelpoinen+A:täytäntöönpano#kelpoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
uloin+A:uloi  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
upouusi+A:upouu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
upouusi+A:upo#uu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
uunilämmin+A:uuniläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
uunilämmin+A:uuni#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
uusi+A:uu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
vahaamaton+A:vahaamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
valtoin+A:valtoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
vanhauusi+A:vanhauu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
vanhin+A:vanhi  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
vasen+A:vase  ADJ_VASEN  ;
venymätön+A:venymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
verisuoneton+A:veri#suonet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
vierin+A:vierin  ADJ_TYVEN  ;
väkevänmakuinen+A:väkevän#makui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
värähtelemätön+A:värähtelemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
väärämielinen+A:väärä#mieli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ylin+A:yli  ADJ_SISIN  ;
